Vermont, session 2025-2026, H24.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. § 2466d is added to read:
§ 2466d. CASHLESS BUSINESSES; PROHIBITION
(a) A seller or lessor who offers goods or services to consumers shall not
refuse to accept cash as a method of payment.
(b) A person who violates this section commits an unfair practice in
commerce in violation of section 2453 of this title.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379546 v.1